Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-720
Multicultural education
program; incorporation into curriculum; department;
duties.

(1) Each school district, in consultation
with the State Department of Education, shall develop for incorporation into
all phases of the curriculum of grades kindergarten through twelve a multicultural
education program.

(2) The department shall create and distribute recommended
multicultural education curriculum guidelines to all school districts. Each
district shall create its own multicultural education program based on such
recommended guidelines.

(3) The incorporation of the multicultural education
program into the curriculum of each district shall not change (a) the number
of instructional hours prescribed for elementary and high school students
or (b) the number of instructional hours dedicated to the existing curriculum
of each district.

Laws 1992, LB 922, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 27, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,230;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 394;

Laws 2011, LB333, § 2.